en: whole kalamon olive
es: aceitunas enteras kalamon
hr: cijeli kalamon maslina
it: oliva kalamon intera
pl: oliwki kalamon całe

en: black olives in oil
it: olive nere sott'olio

en: stuffed olives
de: Gefüllte Oliven
fr: olives farcies
hr: punjene masline
it: olive ripiene

en: pitted olive
de: entsteinte Oliven, entkernte Oliven
es: aceituna deshuesada, aceitunas deshuesadas, aceituna sin hueso, acietunas sin hueso
hr: maslina bez koštice
it: olive denocciolate

en: arbequina olive
de: Arbequina-Olive, Arbequina-Oliven
es: aceituna arbequina, aceitunas arbequinas, aceitunas verdes arbequinas
hr: arbequina maslina
it: oliva Arbequina

en: gordal olive
de: Gordal Olive, Gordal Oliven
es: aceituna gordal
hr: gordalska maslina
it: oliva Gordal

en: manzanilla olive
da: manzanillaoliven
de: Manzanilla Oliven, grüne Manzanilla Oliven
es: aceituna verde manzanilla, aceitunas verdes manzanilla, aceituna manzanilla verde
hr: manzanilla maslina
it: oliva Manzanilla
pl: oliwki manzanilla, oliwki zielone manzanila, manzanilla
sv: manzanillaoliver, gröna manzanillaoliver

en: orange leaves
de: Orangenblätter
fr: feuilles d'oranger
hr: narančasto lišće
it: foglie d'arancio

en: orange blossom, orange flower
ar: ماء زهر
ca: tarongina
da: appelsinblomst
de: Orangenblüten
es: azahar
eu: laranja-lore
fa: بهار نارنج
fr: fleur d'oranger
ga: bláth oráiste
gl: flor de laranxeira
gn: narã poty
it: zagara
ja: オレンジの花
ka: ფლერდორანჟი
nl: orange blossom
pt: flor de laranjeira
ru: флёрдоранж
sl: pomarančni cvet
sv: apelsinblom, apelsinbloms
uk: флердоранж
zh: 橙花

en: orange blossom water, orange flower water
ar: ماء الزهر
ca: aiguanaf
cy: dŵr blodau orennau
da: appelsinblomstvand
de: Orangenblütenwasser
eo: oranĝflora akvo
es: agua de azahar
eu: laranja-lore ura
fi: appelsiininkukkavesi
fr: eau de fleur d'oranger
it: acqua di fiori d'arancio
ja: オレンジ花水
jv: banyu kembang jeruk
ko: 오렌지꽃물
nl: oranjebloesemwater
oc: aiganafa
pl: woda z kwiatów pomarańczy
pt: água-de-flor-de-laranjeira
ru: флёрдоранжевая вода
sl: voda cvetov pomaranče
sv: apelsinblomsvatten
zh: 橙花水

fr: pin sylvestre
la: Pinus sylvestris

en: ononis spinosa
hr: ononis spinosa, korijen zečjeg trna
it: ononis spinosa

en: purple coneflower
xx: echinacae
de: Purpur-Sonnenhut
fr: échinacée pourpre
hu: bibor kasvirág
nl: paarse zonnehoed

en: quinine
ar: كينين
be: Хінін
bg: Хинин
bn: কুইনিন
bs: Kinin
ca: quinina
cs: chinin
cy: cwinin
da: kinin
de: Chinin
el: Κινίνη
eo: Kinino
es: quinina
et: Kiniin
eu: Kinina
fa: کینین
fi: Kiniini
fr: quinine
ga: Cuinín
gl: Quinina
he: כינין
hi: कुनैन
hr: kinin
hu: Kinin
hy: Քինին
id: Kuinina
io: Quinino
it: chinino
ja: キニーネ
ko: 퀴닌
la: Quinina
ln: Kiníni
lv: hinīns
mk: Кинин
my: ကွီနိုင်
nb: kinin
nl: kinine
nn: kinin
oc: Quinina
or: କୁଇନାଇନ୍
pl: chinina, chininy
pt: quinina
ro: Chinină
ru: хинин
sh: Kinin
sk: Chinín
sl: Kinin
sr: Kinin
sv: kinin
sw: Kwinini
tr: Kinin
uk: Хінін
vi: Quinine
zh: 奎寧

en: ribwort plantain
ar: لسان الحمل السهمي
az: Nəştəryarpaq bağayarpağı
be: Трыпутнік ланцэтны
bg: ланцетовиден живовлек
ca: plantatge de fulla estreta
cs: jitrocel kopinatý
cy: Llyriad yr ais
da: Lancet-Vejbred
de: Spitzwegerich
eo: Lancfolia plantago
et: Süstlehine teeleht
eu: Ezpata-plantain
fa: کاردی
fi: Heinäratamo
fr: Plantain lancéolé
ga: Slánlus
gl: Lingua de ovella
hr: uskolisni trputac
hu: Lándzsás útifű
it: piantaggine lanciuola
ja: ヘラオオバコ
ko: 창질경이
ku: Hevîzar
la: Plantago lanceolata
li: Smale waegbrei
lt: Siauralapis gyslotis
nb: Smalkjempe
nl: smalle weegbree
nn: Smalkjempe
os: Лыстæгсыфджын дугъысыф
pl: babka lancetowata
ps: گزک بوټي
qu: Qallu-qallu
ru: Подорожник ланцетолистный
sk: skorocel kopijovitý
sl: Ozkolistni trpotec
sr: мушка боквица
sv: Svartkämpar
tr: Dar yapraklı sinirli ot
uk: подорожник ланцетолистий
wa: Oraye-di-live
zh: 长叶车前

en: rooibos
af: Rooibos
ar: رويبوس
bg: ройбос
br: Te ruz
ca: Rooibos
cs: Rooibos
da: Rooibos
de: Rooibos, Rotbusch
eo: Rojbos-arbusto
es: rooibos
et: Rooibos, Tee-punapõõsas
eu: Rooibos
fa: راوند
fi: rooibos, kapinroibospensas, kapinroibos, rooibos-pensaan lehti
fr: rooibos
gl: Rooibos
he: רויבוש
hr: afričkog crvenog grma, aspalanthus linearis
hu: Vörös fokföldirekettye
id: Rooibos
it: Rooibos
ja: ルイボス
kk: Ройбұш
ko: 루이보스
la: Aspalathus linearis
lb: Rooibos
lt: rooibos
lv: rooibos tēja
ms: Rooibos
nb: Rooibos
nl: rooibos
pl: Rooibos
pt: rooibos
ro: Rooibos
ru: Ройбос
sl: Rooibos
sr: Роибос
sv: Rooibos
tr: rooibos
uk: Ройбуш
vi: Chè Rooibos
zh: 南非茶

en: organic rooibos
de: Bio Rooibos
fi: luomu rooibos
fr: rooibos biologique
hr: organski rooibos
it: rooibos biologico
nl: biologische rooibos

en: rose petals
de: rosenblatt
es: pétalos de rosa
fi: ruusun terälehdet
fr: pétales de rose
hr: ružine latice
it: petalo di rosa
pl: płatki róży, płatki róż
ro: petale de trandafiri

en: rose water, rosewater
ar: ماء الورد, ماء ورد
az: gülab
bg: вода от рози, розова вода
bn: গোলাপ জল
ca: aigua de roses
cy: dŵr rhosod
da: rosenvand
de: Rosenwasser
el: ροδόνερο
eo: rozakvo
es: agua de rosas
eu: arrosa-ur
fa: گلاب
fi: ruusuvesi
fr: eau de rose
hi: गुलाब जल
hr: ružina vodica
id: air mawar
it: acqua di rose
ja: ローズウォーター
jv: banyu mawar
kk: раушан суы
ko: 장미수
ku: gulav
la: aqua rosacea
mk: розова вода
ml: അത്തർ
ms: air mawar
nb: rosenvann, rosenvatn, rosevann, rosevatn
nl: rozenwater
nn: rosevatn
pl: woda różana
pt: agua de rosas
ro: apă de trandafiri
ru: розовая вода
sh: ružina vodica
sl: rožna voda
sr: ружина водица
sv: rosenvatten
ta: பன்னீர்
tg: гулоб
th: น้ำดอกไม้เทศ
tl: tubig-rosas
tr: gülsuyu
uk: трояндова вода
ur: عرق گلاب
uz: atirgul suvi
vi: nước hoa hồng
zh: 蔷薇水

en: roselle flower, hibiscus flower, hibiscus flowers, hibiscus, roselle
ar: كركديه
as: টেঙামৰা
az: Məkkə çayı
bg: цвят хибискус
ca: rosa de Jamaica
cs: ibišek súdánský
da: hibiskusblomst
de: Karkadeblüten, Roselle, Hibiskus, Hibiskusblüte, Hibiskusblüten
eo: Sabdarifo
es: Flor Roselle, hibisco, flor de jamaica
fa: روزل
fi: teehibiskus, hibiskus, hibiskuksen kukka
fr: fleurs de carcadé, fleurs d'hibiscus, hibiscus
gu: અંબાડી
hr: hibiskus cvijet, cvijet hibiskusa, cvjetovi hibiskusa, Hibiskus, hibiskusa
hu: rozella
id: Rosela
it: flori di carcadè, Ibisco
ja: ローゼル
jv: Rosela
ko: 로젤
la: Hibiscus sabdariffa
ln: Ngai ngai
lt: Jamaikinė kinrožė
ml: പുളിവെണ്ട
mr: अंबाडी
ms: Asam belanda
my: ချဉ်ပေါင်
nb: hibiskusblomst
nl: hibiscusbloem, roselle, hibiscus
pl: Ketmia szczawiowa, kwiat hibiskusa, hibiskus, hibiskusa, kwiatów hibiskusa
pt: Vinagreira
ru: Розелла
sd: کٽنبڙو
su: Rosella
sv: Rosellhibiskus, hibiskusblomma
te: గోంగూర
th: กระเจี๊ยบเปรี้ยว
tr: hibiskus, kerkede
zh: 玫瑰茄